Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1713
Sheriff's fees; summons issued out of county; return.

When a summons is issued to another county than that in which the action or proceeding is pending, it may be returned by mail, and the sheriff shall be entitled to the same fees as if the summons had issued in the county of which he is sheriff.

R.S.1867, Code § 625, p. 505;

R.S.1913, § 8172;

C.S.1922, § 9123;

C.S.1929, § 20-1713;

R.S.1943, § 25-1713.